Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Department of  Public Safety Standards and
Training, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of
$9,665,010 for debt service.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 48,113,789
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 279,495
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,364,566 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received  by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 3, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 2